Connecticut, session 2026, SB00110.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
five hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection for the
purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the town of Franklin to address a
well contaminated with perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
that is associated with the Franklin Town Hall and wells contaminated
with other chemicals at the Franklin Volunteer Fire Department.